District of Columbia statutes.
8-2131.03

Inspection.

(a)

The Mayor, acting on the Mayor’s own information or observation, or on the information or observation of another person, may inspect occupied or vacant property to investigate an allegation of a public health nuisance.

(b)

Upon the presentation of appropriate credentials to the owner or occupant of the property, the Mayor shall conduct the inspection during reasonable times and in a reasonable manner.

(c)

If the owner or occupant of the property denies the Mayor access for the purposes of this section, the Mayor may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant.

(d)

If, as a result of an inspection, the Mayor determines that a public health nuisance exists, the Mayor may order the owner or occupant to take appropriate action to abate the public health nuisance in accordance with § 8-2131.05.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-163, § 4, 51 DCR 3683

History